Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1 Establishment
54-12-143. Appeal bond signed for all petitioner appellants by a designated petitioner — Surety on bond required — Pauper's oath not allowed.

If an order has been entered by the monthly county court creating or establishing the district, and giving it a name or designation, the bonds, when the district or petitioners for the district are appellants, may be made by the district in that name, to be signed by one (1) of the petitioners nominated for that purpose by the court, it being declared the duty of the court to nominate some of the petitioners for this purpose.

On any appeal from the circuit court to an appellate court, the name of the district, if it has been ordered established by the court, may in like manner be signed to any appeal bond, the circuit court nominating the petitioner to so sign it.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as excusing the giving of good security on any bonds for appeal, and the district shall be liable for any damages and costs adjudged against it on any appeal as well as the sureties on the bonds.

The oath provided by law for poor persons shall not be allowed in lieu of the bonds.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 33; Shan. Supp., § 1682a44; Code 1932, § 2858; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1343.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-144. Appeal from award of damages will not prevent appropriation and condemnation of land, if petitioners give bond.

When an appeal is taken and prosecuted from the judgment or order of the monthly county court awarding damages, the appeal shall not prevent the work of the improvement district from proceeding, nor with the appropriation and condemnation of the lands, as provided in §§ 54-12-151 and 54-12-152, if the district or the petitioners for the appeal, or any of them, give bond with good security, payable to the party or person awarded damages in double the amount of damages awarded and costs as may be awarded on appeal.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 34; Shan. Supp., § 1682a45; Code 1932, § 2859; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1344.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-145. Appeal heard de novo by circuit court that enters no judgment but enters amount fixed — Clerk certifies to monthly county court.

The circuit court shall hear the appeal de novo; and if the appeal is from the amount of damages allowed by the monthly county court, the amount ascertained and fixed by the circuit court shall be entered of record, but no judgment shall be entered. The amount thus ascertained shall be certified by the clerk of the circuit court to the monthly county court, which shall thereafter proceed as if the monthly county court had allowed the claimant that amount as damages.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 35; Shan. Supp., § 1682a46; Code 1932, § 2860; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1345.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-146. Circuit court order entered — Certified to monthly county court.

If the appeal is from the action of the monthly county court in establishing or refusing to establish the road improvement district, the circuit court shall enter an order as it deems just and proper in the premises, and the clerk of the circuit court shall certify the same to the monthly county court, which shall proceed thereafter in the matter in accordance with the order of the circuit court.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 36; Shan. Supp., § 1682a47; Code 1932, § 2861; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1346.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-147. Appellants as plaintiffs in circuit court — Consolidation of damage cases — One transcript in several appeals.

In the circuit court, the cases shall be docketed with the appellant or appellants as plaintiffs, and the adversary parties as defendants, and where there are several appellants on questions of damages, the circuit court may consolidate the causes and hear or try them together, if practicable, making proper findings or orders as to each.

If the appeals from orders of the monthly county court are made at the same session where there are several appellants, at their request, only one (1) transcript shall be made.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 37; Shan. Supp., § 1682a48; Code 1932, § 2862; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1347.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-148. Costs in discretion of circuit court.

On the appeals, it shall rest in the discretion of the circuit court how costs shall be adjudged and distributed among the litigants.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 38; Shan. Supp., § 1682a49; Code 1932, § 2863; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1348.

54-12-149. Trial with or without a jury in circuit court.

The trial in the circuit court shall be with or without a jury, as the court may deem the right of the parties to be, under the particular issues to be tried, the right to a jury being accorded wherever the parties have the right under the law of the land.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 39; Shan. Supp., § 1682a50; Code 1932, § 2864; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1349.

54-12-150. Damages fixed shall be paid or secured — Manner of payment.

After the amount of damages due any claimant or claimants has been finally ascertained and fixed by the monthly county court, the court shall require the damages to be paid, in the first instance, by the parties benefited by the road improvement district, or be secured, to be paid upon terms and conditions the court deems just and proper.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 40; Shan. Supp., § 1682a51; Code 1932, § 2865; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1350.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-151. Condemnation after damages are paid or secured.

After the damages have been paid or secured, the monthly county court shall enter a proper order of condemnation showing all the lands are appropriated and belong to the road improvement district for all its necessary purposes.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 41; Shan. Supp., § 1682a52; Code 1932, § 2866; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1351.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-152. Appropriation of right-of-way, and of other necessary lands.

In establishing any road improvement district, all necessary lands may be appropriated as provided in this part and a right-of-way of as much as one hundred feet (100') may be so appropriated if deemed necessary for the sites and location of any road to be built under this chapter, but the provision in this section as to the width of the right-of-way shall not prevent the monthly county court from ordering the appropriation of other lands deemed necessary for the purposes of the improvement district under this chapter.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 42; Shan. Supp., § 1682a53; Code 1932, § 2867; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1352.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Collateral References.

Injunction against exercise of power of eminent domain. 93 A.L.R.2d 465.

54-12-153. Engineer or another appointee directed to make more complete survey and estimate of cost of improvement.

After the road improvement district is established by the monthly county court, and all damages paid or secured, if the court is of the opinion that the report of the engineer already made is not sufficiently full or definite to enable the proper letting of contracts for the construction of the improvement, or for other reasons is not as full and definite as it should be, the court shall direct the engineer, or another appointed by the court for that purpose, to make a further and more complete survey and estimates of the district and cost of proposed improvements, and report to the court as to the same, giving all necessary and required information; how much of the improvements will be upon each tract of land, as nearly as practicable, giving definite estimates as to the cost and character of work, and dividing the work into convenient sections for making contracts, etc., and giving other particulars the court sees fit to direct.

The report of the engineer shall be made and filed with the county clerk without unreasonable delay, and if the engineer fails to act with reasonable promptness, the court may remove the engineer and appoint another.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 43; Shan. Supp., § 1682a54; Code 1932, § 2868; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1353.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-154. Publication — Requisites — Effect.

Publication in a newspaper published in the county where the petition is filed and proceedings are pending, for two (2) consecutive weeks, of the time and place set for the hearing of the petition to establish the district, shall be sufficient notice to the persons concerned as owners, lienholders, encumbrancers, mortgagees, occupants, or in any other way, whether residents of the state, or nonresidents of the state, the last publication to be at least ten (10) days before the date set for the hearing.

The notice by publication shall have the same force and effect upon those concerned as mentioned in subsection (a), who are not petitioners, and who are residents of the state, as well as nonresidents, for all purposes of the proceedings, as process would have duly issued from the court and served personally upon them by an officer.

The publication notice need not give the names of the persons notified to appear, but need give only a brief statement of the purpose of the hearing, a reference to the petition on file for further information, as to the purpose of the proceeding, before what court the petition is to be heard, and the time and place of hearing; provided, that if the proposed district is to embrace lands in more than one (1) county, if established, the publication shall be made in one (1) newspaper published in each of the counties.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 125; Shan. Supp., § 1682a139; Code 1932, § 2954; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1354.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Hearings, §§ 54-12-108, 54-12-132, 54-12-133, 54-12-135.

Publication of hearing assessments and apportionments, § 54-12-209.

54-12-155. Intent of § 54-12-154.

Section 54-12-154 is not intended to repeal any portion of this chapter, but is intended to furnish an additional method of proceeding, to bring the parties concerned before the court in seeking to establish a road improvement district, and to leave the petitioners for the district to their option whether they will proceed under other provisions of this chapter or under § 54-12-154 in giving notice to the parties of the hearing, and in bringing them before the court.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 126; Shan. Supp., § 1682a140; Code 1932, § 2955; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1355.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-156. Road improvement record book — Maintenance by county clerk — Contents — Entries made in regular minute book.

In any county where a road improvement district is sought to be established, the county clerk of the county shall provide a book to be known as the road improvement record and to be paid for by the county.

The clerk shall keep in the road improvement record a full and complete record of all proceedings in each case arising under this chapter, including all orders made by the monthly county court, and certified from the circuit court, and a copy of the original petition shall be enrolled in the book of record, and all bonds required to be given; and all orders and judgments of the monthly county court, touching any matter of the district, may be entered into the regular minute book; but it shall be sufficient if the orders or judgments are entered either upon the road improvement record or the regular minute book.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 65; Shan. Supp., § 1682a79; Code 1932, § 2893; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1356; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-157. Fees of county clerk — Allowance for extra services.

The fees of the county clerk in proceedings under this chapter shall be the same as for similar services now allowed by law, and in such case the monthly county court may allow the clerk an additional sum for extra services or services not covered by existing fee bills or statutes, to be fixed by the court, and paid as other costs and expenses in the case of proceeding.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 66; Shan. Supp., § 1682a80; Code 1932, § 2894; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1357; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-158. Compensation and expenses of viewers, commissioners, and of helpers.

The viewers and commissioners provided for by this part and part 2 of this chapter shall be paid at the rate of three dollars ($3.00) per day while engaged in the work, and, in addition, all actual expenses, including board paid for, itemized accounts for the expenses being reported and sworn.

Other necessary help aiding the engineers, viewers, or commissioners such as chain carriers, axmen, etc., shall be paid not more than two dollars ($2.00) per day.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 107; Shan. Supp., § 1682a121; Code 1932, § 2936; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1358.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-159. Compensation to be fixed by monthly county court where no provision made.

If any services are required of any person under this chapter, and the rate of pay is not provided within this chapter, then the monthly county court shall fix the amount, or rate of pay in those cases.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 112; Shan. Supp., § 1682a126; Code 1932, § 2941; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1359.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.